Arkansas, session 2025, HB1460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-4-202(a)(2)(A), concerning the members
of the Arkansas Economic Development Council, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) At least three (3) members shall be appointed from each of
the four (4) congressional districts existing on January 1, 2012 as they
exist at the time of appointment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-6-104(b)(1)(A)(ii), concerning the
Arkansas Rural Development Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) One (1) member shall be appointed from each of the
four (4) congressional districts of the state as constituted January 1, 1990,
as they exist at the time of appointment and shall be a resident of a rural
area of that congressional district.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-75-201(b)(1), concerning the members of
the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board, is amended to read as follows:
*LGL036*
02-20-2025 11:47:42 LGL036

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1460
(b)(1) There shall be one (1) member appointed by the Governor from
each congressional district, as the districts existed on January 1, 2007 as
they exist at the time of appointment.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-112-201(b)(1), concerning the Arkansas
Motor Vehicle Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) One (1) commissioner shall be appointed from each of the four
(4) congressional districts of the state as constituted July 1, 1975 as they
exist at the time of appointment, and five (5) members of the commission,
including the consumer representative and the representative of the elderly,
shall be appointed from the state at large.

/s/Rose























02-20-2025 11:47:42 LGL036